California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The Department of the Youth Authority shall annually develop a population management and facilities master plan presenting projected population and strategies for treatment and housing of wards for the succeeding five-year period. This plan shall set forth the department’s strategy for bridging the gap between available bedspace and the projected ward population.

(b) The Department of the Youth Authority may contract with the Department of Corrections or the Office of Project Development and Management within the Department of General Services for professional and construction services related to the construction of facilities or renovation projects included in the Department of
 the Youth Authority’s 1994–99 master plan for which funds are appropriated by the Legislature. The Department of the Youth Authority shall be responsible for program planning and all design decisions. The Department of Corrections or the Department of General Services shall, in consultation with the Department of the Youth Authority, ensure that all facilities are designed and constructed specifically for the needs of the youthful offender population. The Department of the Youth Authority also shall ensure that the design and construction of any facilities are consistent with the mission of the Department of the Youth Authority, which emphasizes the protection of the public from criminal activity and the rehabilitation of youthful offenders by providing education, training, and treatment services for those offenders committed by the courts. Any power, function, or jurisdiction for planning, design, and construction of facilities or renovation projects pursuant to the 1994–99 master plan that is conferred
 upon the Department of General Services shall be deemed to be conferred upon the Department of Corrections for purposes of this section. The Director of the Department of General Services may, upon the request of the Director of the Department of Corrections, delegate to the Department of Corrections any power, function, or jurisdiction for planning, design, and construction of any additional projects included within subsequent Department of the Youth Authority master plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 188.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1761.

The Youth Authority shall establish policies for a background assessment of all persons committed to the Youth Authority in order to supplement the case history provided by the county which committed the person to it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1762.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that youth with a high school diploma or California high school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a Division of Juvenile Justice facility shall have access to rigorous postsecondary academic and career technical education programs that fulfill the requirements for transfer to the University of California and the California State University and prepare them for career entry, respectively.

(b) (1) The Division of Juvenile Justice shall, to the extent feasible using available resources, ensure that youth with a high school diploma or California high school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a Division of Juvenile Justice facility have
 access to, and can choose to participate in, public postsecondary academic and career technical courses and programs offered online, and for which they are eligible based on eligibility criteria and course schedules of the public postsecondary education campus providing the course or program. The division is also encouraged to develop other educational partnerships with local public postsecondary campuses, as is feasible, to provide programs on campus and onsite at the Division of Juvenile Justice facility.

(2) These programs shall be considered part of the current responsibilities of the Division of Juvenile Justice to provide and coordinate services for youth that enable the youth to be law-abiding and productive members of their families and communities.

(c) For purposes of this section, “youth” means any person detained in, or committed to, a Division of Juvenile Justice
 facility.

(d) This section does not preclude youth who have not yet completed their high school graduation requirements from concurrently participating in postsecondary academic and career technical education programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 47.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1763.

The authority shall keep written records of all examinations and of the conclusions predicated thereon and of all orders concerning the disposition or treatment of every person subject to its control. After five years from the date on which the jurisdiction of the authority over a ward is terminated the authority may destroy such records. For the purposes of this section “destroy” means destroy or dispose of for the purpose of destruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 250.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any of the following information in the possession of the Youth Authority regarding persons 16 years of age or older who were committed to the Youth Authority by a court of criminal jurisdiction, or who were committed to the Department of Corrections and were subsequently transferred to the Youth Authority, shall be disclosed to any member of the public, upon request, by the director or the director’s designee:

(1) The name and age of the person.

(2) The court of commitment and the offense that was the basis of commitment.

(3) The date of commitment.

(4) Any institution where the person is or was confined.

(5) The actions taken by any paroling authority regarding the person, which relate to parole dates.

(6) The date the person is scheduled to be released to the community, including release to a reentry work furlough program.

(7) The date the person was placed on parole.

(8) The date the person was discharged from the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority and the basis for the discharge.

(9) In any case
 where the person has escaped from any institution under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority, a physical description of the person and the circumstances of the escape.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize the release of any information that could place any individual in personal peril; that could threaten Youth Authority security; or that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 434.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director or his or her designee may release the information described in Section 1764 regarding a person committed to the Youth Authority by a juvenile court for an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 676, to any member of the public who requests the information, unless the court has ordered confidentiality under subdivision (c) of Section 676.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice or the director’s designee shall release the information described in Section 1764 regarding a person committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, to the victim of the offense, the next of kin of the victim, or his or her representative as designated by the victim or next of kin pursuant to Section 1767, upon request, unless the court has ordered confidentiality under subdivision (c) of Section 676. The victim or the next of kin shall be identified by the court or the probation department in the offender’s commitment documents before the director is required to disclose this information.

(b) The Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice or the director’s designee shall, with respect to persons committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, including persons committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who have been transferred to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, inform each victim of that offense, the victim’s next of kin, or his or her representative as designated by the victim or next of kin pursuant to Section 1767, of his or her right to request and receive information pursuant to subdivision (a) and Section 1767.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 101.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.3.

(a) Whenever a person is committed to the Youth Authority by a court of criminal jurisdiction, or is committed to the Department of Corrections and subsequently transferred to the Youth Authority, for a conviction of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, the director or his or her designee shall, with respect to that person, provide all notices that would be required to be provided by the Board of Prison Terms or the Department of Corrections pursuant to Sections 3058.6 and 3058.8 of the Penal Code, if that person were confined in their respective institutions.

(b) In order to be entitled to receive from the department, pursuant to subdivision (a), the notice set forth in Section 3058.8 of the Penal Code, the requesting party shall keep the department informed of his or her current mailing address.

(c) The notice required under this section shall be provided within 10 days of release with respect to persons committed to the Youth Authority by a court of criminal jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.5.

Whenever a minor is incarcerated in a Youth Authority facility for a period of at least 30 consecutive days, the Youth Authority shall inform the State Department of Social Services of the name, date of birth, social security number, and county of residence of the incarcerated person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1042, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the Department of the Youth Authority and the Youth Authority Board shall keep under continued study a person in their control and shall retain him or her, subject to the limitations of this chapter, under supervision and control so long as in their judgment that control is necessary for the protection of the public.

(b) The board shall discharge that person as soon as in its opinion there is reasonable probability that he or she can be given full liberty without danger to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 33.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.

(a) Subject to Sections 733 and 1767.35, and subdivision (b) of this section, if a person has been committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, the Board of Juvenile Hearings, according to standardized review and appeal procedures established by the board in policy and regulation and subject to the powers and duties enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 1719, may do any of the following:

(1) Set a date on which the ward shall be discharged from the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities and permitted his or her liberty under supervision of probation and subject to the jurisdiction of the committing court pursuant to
 subdivision (b).

(2) Deny discharge, except that a person committed to the division pursuant to Section 731 or 1731.5 shall not be held in physical confinement for a total period of time in excess of the maximum periods of time set forth in Section 731.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to any ward eligible for discharge from that ward’s commitment to the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities. Any order entered by the court pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with evidence-based practices and the interest of public safety.

(1) The county of commitment shall supervise the reentry of any ward still subject to the court’s jurisdiction and discharged from
 the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities. The conditions of the ward’s supervision shall be established by the court pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(2) Not less than 60 days prior to the scheduled discharge consideration hearing of a ward described in this subdivision, the division shall provide to the probation department and the court of the committing county, and the ward’s counsel, if known, the most recent written review prepared pursuant to Section 1720, along with notice of the discharge consideration hearing date.

(3) (A) Not less than 30 days prior to the scheduled discharge consideration hearing, the division shall notify the ward of the date and location of the discharge consideration hearing. A ward shall have the right
 to contact the ward’s parent or guardian, if he or she can reasonably be located, to inform the parent or guardian of the date and location of the discharge consideration hearing. The division shall also allow the ward to inform other persons identified by the ward, if they can reasonably be located, and who are considered by the division as likely to contribute to a ward’s preparation for the discharge consideration hearing or the ward’s postrelease success.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if either of the following conditions is met:

(i) A minor chooses not to contact the minor’s parents, guardians, or other persons and the director of the division facility determines it would be in the best interest of the minor not to contact the parents, guardians, or other persons.

(ii) A person 18 years of age or older does not consent to the contact.

(C) Upon intake of a ward committed to a division facility, and again upon attaining 18 years of age while serving the ward’s commitment in the custody of the division, an appropriate staff person shall explain the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B), using language clearly understandable to the ward.

(D) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the right of a ward to an attorney under any other law.

(4) Not less than 30 days prior to the scheduled discharge consideration hearing of a ward described in this subdivision, the probation department of the committing county may
 provide the division with its written plan for the reentry supervision of the ward. At the discharge consideration hearing, the Board of Juvenile Hearings shall, in determining whether the ward is to be released, consider a reentry supervision plan submitted by the county.

(5) If the Board of Juvenile Hearings determines that a ward is ready for discharge to county supervision pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall do both of the following:

(A) Set a date for discharge from the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities no less than 14 days after the date of such determination. The board shall also record any postrelease recommendations for the ward. These recommendations will be sent to the committing court responsible for setting the ward’s conditions of
 supervision no later than seven days from the date of such determination.

(B) Notify the ward that he or she may petition the board for an honorable discharge after 18 months following his or her discharge by the board, provided that he or she is not on probation.

(6) No more than four days but no less than one day prior to the scheduled date of the reentry disposition hearing before the committing court, the Division of Juvenile Facilities shall transport and deliver the ward to the custody of the probation department of the committing county. On or prior to a ward’s date of discharge from the Division of Juvenile Facilities, the committing court shall convene a reentry disposition hearing for the ward. The purpose of the hearing shall be for the court to identify those conditions of supervision
 that are appropriate under all the circumstances of the case and consistent with evidence-based practices. The court shall, to the extent it deems appropriate, incorporate postrelease recommendations made by the board as well as any reentry plan submitted by the county probation department and reviewed by the board into its disposition order. At the hearing the ward shall be fully informed of the terms and conditions of any order entered by the court, including the consequences for any violation thereof. The procedure of the reentry disposition hearing shall otherwise be consistent with the rules, rights, and procedures applicable to delinquency disposition hearings as described in Article 17 (commencing with Section 675) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2.

(7) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall have no further
 jurisdiction over a ward who is discharged by the Board of Juvenile Hearings, except that the board shall make honorable discharge determinations.

(8) Notwithstanding any other law or any other provision of this section, commencing January 1, 2013, all wards who remain on parole under the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities shall be discharged, except for wards who are in custody pending revocation proceedings or serving a term of revocation. A ward that is pending revocation proceedings or serving a term of revocation shall be discharged after serving the ward’s revocation term, including any revocation extensions, or when any allegations of violating the terms and conditions of the ward’s parole are not sustained.

(c) Within 60 days of intake, the Division
 of Juvenile Facilities shall provide the court and the probation department with a treatment plan for the ward.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, for the preceding fiscal year, the department shall collect and make available to the public the following information:

(1) The total number of ward case reviews conducted by the division and the board, categorized by guideline category.

(2) The number of discharge consideration dates for each category set at guideline, above guideline, and below guideline.

(3) The number of ward case reviews resulting in a change to a discharge consideration date, including the category assigned to the ward and the
 specific reason for the change.

(4) The percentage of wards who have had a discharge consideration date changed to a later date, the percentage of wards who have had a discharge consideration date changed to an earlier date, and the average annual time added or subtracted per case.

(5) The number and percentage of wards who, while confined or on parole, are charged with a new misdemeanor or felony criminal offense.

(6) Any additional data or information identified by the department as relevant.

(e) As used in subdivision (d), the term “ward case review” means any review of a ward that changes, maintains, or appreciably affects the programs, treatment, or
 placement of a ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 683, Sec. 8.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.1.

When permitting an adult or minor committed to the Department of the Youth Authority his or her liberty pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1766, the Youth Authority Board shall impose as a condition thereof that the adult or minor pay in full any restitution fine or restitution order imposed pursuant to Section 13967, as operative on or before September 28, 1994, of the Government Code, or Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, or Section 1203.4, as operative on or before August 2, 1994, of the Penal Code, or Section 730.6 or 731.1, as operative on or before August 2, 1995. Payment shall be in installments set in an amount consistent with the adult’s or minor’s ability to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 35.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all applicable wards shall be placed on supervised parole within the period of 120 to 90 days prior to the date of release from custody from a Division of Juvenile Facilities institution pursuant to the discharge provisions of Section 1769, 1770, or 1771, or within the period of 120 to 90 days prior to completion of the maximum period of confinement pursuant to Section 731, whichever comes first.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply when a petition or order for further detention of a juvenile has been requested by the Division of Juvenile Facilities or the Juvenile Parole Board pursuant to Section 1800.

(c) A ward who has been released
 under the provisions of subdivision (a) shall be subject to revocation of parole for alleged violations committed during the period of release. Any term of reconfinement under these circumstances shall remain subject to the limits of Section 731, 1769, 1770, or 1771, as applicable in each case. Any such revocation proceedings shall be in accordance with the procedures and due process protections for parolees under current law.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “applicable ward” means a person who is confined in a facility or institution operated by the Division of Juvenile Facilities 120 days prior to his or her discharge date under Section 1769, 1770, or 1771, or 120 days prior to completion of the maximum period of confinement under Section 731.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 268, Sec. 3.   (AB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.5.

The director shall establish and maintain a fair, simple, and expeditious system for resolution of grievances of all persons committed to the Youth Authority regarding the substance or application of any written or unwritten policy, rule, regulation, or practice of the department or of an agent or contractor of the department or any decision, behavior, or action by an employee, agent, contractor, or other person confined within the institutions or camps of the Youth Authority which is directed toward the grievant, other than matters involving individual discipline. The system shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide for the participation of employees of the department and of persons committed to the Youth Authority on as equal a basis and at the most decentralized level reasonably possible and feasible in the design, implementation, and operation of the system.

(b) Provide, to the extent reasonably possible, for the selection by their peers of persons committed to the Youth Authority as participants in the design, implementation, and operation of the system.

(c) Provide, within specific time limits, for written responses with written reasons in support of them to all grievances at all decision levels within the system.

(d) Provide for priority processing of grievances which are of an emergency nature which would, by passage of time required for normal processing, subject the grievant to substantial risk of personal injury or other damage.

(e) Provide for the right of grievants to be represented by another person committed to the Youth Authority who is confined within the institutions or camps of the Youth Authority, by an employee, or by any other person, including a volunteer, who is a regular participant in departmental operations.

(f) Provide for safeguards against reprisals against any grievant or participant in the resolution of a grievance.

(g) Provide, at one or more decision levels of the process, for a full hearing of the grievance at which all parties to the controversy and their representatives shall have the opportunity to be present and to present evidence and contentions regarding the grievance,

(h) Provide a method of appeal of grievance decisions available to all parties to the grievance, including, but not limited to, final right of appeal to advisory arbitration of the grievance by a neutral person not employed by the department, the decision of the arbitrator to be adopted by the department unless the decision is in violation of law, would result in physical danger to any persons, would require expenditure of funds not reasonably available for that purpose to the department, or, in the personal judgment of the director, would be detrimental to the public or to the proper and effective accomplishment of the duties of the department.

(i) Provide for the monitoring of the system by the department and also, pursuant to contract or other appropriate means, for a biennial evaluation of the system by a public or private agency independent of the department to the extent necessary to ascertain whether the requirements of this section are being met. The results of which evaluation shall be filed with the department, the Legislature, the Attorney General, and the State Public Defender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.

(a) Upon request, written notice of any hearing to consider the release on parole of any person under the control of the Youth Authority for the commission of a crime or committed to the authority as a person described in Section 602 shall be sent by the Department of the Youth Authority at least 30 days before the hearing to any victim of a crime committed by the person, or to the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died or is a minor. The requesting party shall keep the board apprised of his or her current mailing address.

(b) Any one of the following persons may appear, personally or by counsel, at the hearing:

(1) The victim of the offense and one support person of his or her choosing.

(2) In the event that the victim is unable to attend the proceeding, two support persons designated by the victim may attend to provide information about the impact of the crime on the victim.

(3) If the victim is no longer living, two members of the victim’s immediate family may attend.

(4) If none of those persons appear personally at the hearing, any one of them may submit a statement recorded on videotape for the board’s consideration at the hearing. Those persons shall also have the right to submit a written statement to the board at least 10 days prior to the scheduled hearing for the board’s consideration at the hearing.

(c) The board, in deciding whether to
 release the person on parole, shall consider the statements of victims, next of kin, or statements made on their behalf pursuant to this section and shall include in its report a statement of whether the person would pose a threat to public safety if released on parole.

(d) A representative designated by the victim or the victim’s next of kin shall be either that person’s legal counsel or a family or household member of the victim, for the purposes of this section.

(e) Support persons may only provide information about the impact of the crime on the victim and provide physical and emotional support to the victim or the victim’s family.

(f) This section does not prevent the board from excluding a victim or his or her support person or persons from a hearing. The board may allow the presence of other support persons
 under particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding.

(g) The provisions of this section shall not be amended by the Legislature except by statute passed in each house by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, or by a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the electors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 570.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on June 8, 1982, by initiative Prop. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.1.

At least 30 days before the Youth Authority Board meets to review or consider the parole of any person who has been committed to the control of the Department of the Youth Authority for the commission of any offense described in subdivision (b), paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or subdivision (e) of Section 707, or for the commission of an offense in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 262 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 of the Penal Code, the board shall send written notice of the hearing to each of the following persons: the judge of the court that committed the person to the authority, the attorney for the person, the district attorney of the county from which the person was committed, the law enforcement agency that investigated the case, and the victim pursuant to Section 1767. The board shall also send a progress report regarding the ward to the judge of the court that committed the person at the same time it sends the written notice to the judge.

Each of the persons so notified shall have the right to submit a written statement to the board at least 10 days prior to the decision for the board’s consideration. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit any person so notified to attend the hearing. With respect to the parole of any person over the age of 18 years, the presiding officer of the board shall state findings and supporting reasons for the decision of the board. The findings and reasons shall be reduced to writing, and shall be made available for inspection by members of the public no later than 30 days from the date of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 36.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.2.

Every order granting probation or parole to any person under the control of the authority who has been convicted of any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290 of the Penal Code shall require as a condition of such probation or parole that such person totally abstain from the use of alcoholic liquor or beverages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.3.

(a) The written order of the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice is a sufficient warrant for any peace officer to return to custody any person who has escaped from the custody of the Division of Juvenile Facilities or from any institution or facility in which he or she has been placed by the division.

(b) All peace officers shall execute the orders in like manner as a felony warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 51.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.35.

(a) For a ward discharged from the Division of Juvenile Justice to the jurisdiction of the committing court, that person may be detained by probation, for the purpose of initiating proceedings to modify the ward’s conditions of supervision entered pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1766 if there is probable cause to believe that the ward has violated any of the court-ordered conditions of supervision. Within 15 days of detention, the committing court shall conduct a modification hearing for the ward. Pending the hearing, the ward may be detained by probation. At the hearing authorized by this subdivision, at which the ward shall be entitled to representation by counsel, the court shall consider the alleged violation of conditions of supervision, the risks and needs presented by the ward, and the supervision
 programs and sanctions that are available for the ward. Modification may include, as a sanction for a finding of a serious violation or a series of repeated violations of the conditions of supervision, an order for the reconfinement of a ward under 18 years of age in a juvenile facility, or for the reconfinement of a ward 18 years of age or older in a juvenile facility as authorized by Section 208.5, or for the reconfinement of a ward 18 years of age or older in a local adult facility as authorized by subdivision (b), or, until July 1, 2021, the Division of Juvenile Justice as authorized by subdivision (c). The ward shall be fully informed by the court of the terms, conditions, responsibilities, and sanctions that are relevant to the order that is adopted by the court. The procedure of the supervision modification hearing, including the detention status of the ward in the event continuances are ordered by the court, shall be consistent with the rules, rights, and procedures applicable to delinquency
 disposition hearings, as described in Article 17 (commencing with Section 675) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, subject to Chapter 1.6. (commencing with Section 1980), and consistent with the maximum periods of time set forth in Section 731, in any case in which a person who was committed to and discharged from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice to the jurisdiction of the committing court attains 18 years of age prior to being discharged from the division or during the period of supervision by the committing court, the court may, upon a finding that the ward violated their conditions of supervision and after consideration of the recommendation of the probation officer and pursuant to a hearing conducted according to the provisions of subdivision (a), order that the person be delivered to the custody of the sheriff for a period not to exceed a total of 90 days,
 as a custodial sanction consistent with the reentry goals and requirements imposed by the court pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1766. Notwithstanding any other law, the sheriff may allow the person to come into and remain in contact with other adults in the county jail or in any other county correctional facility in which the person is housed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to Chapter 1.6 (commencing with Section 1980), in any case in which a person who was committed to and discharged from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, to the jurisdiction of the committing court, the juvenile court may, upon a finding that the ward violated their conditions of supervision and after consideration of the recommendation of the probation officer and pursuant to a hearing conducted according to the provisions of subdivision (a), order that the person be returned to the custody
 of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, for a specified amount of time no shorter than 90 days and no longer than one year. This return shall be a sanction consistent with the reentry goals and requirements imposed by the court pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1766. A decision to return a ward to the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice can only be made prior to July 1, 2021, and pursuant to the court making the following findings: (1) that appropriate local options and programs have been exhausted, and (2) that the ward has available confinement time that is greater than or equal to the length of the return.

(d) Upon ordering a ward to the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice, the court shall send to the Division of Juvenile Justice a copy of its order along with a copy of the ward’s probation plans and history while under the supervision of the
 county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 19.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.4.

Whenever any person paroled by the Youth Authority Board is returned to the department upon the order of the director by a peace officer or probation officer, the officer shall be paid the same fees and expenses as are allowed those officers by law for the transportation of persons to institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 38.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.5.

The authority may pay any private home for the care of any person committed to the authority and paroled by the Youth Authority Board to the custody of the private home (including both persons committed to the authority under this chapter and persons committed to it by the juvenile court) at a rate to be approved by the Department of Finance. Payments for the care of paroled persons may be made from funds available to the authority for that purpose, or for the support of the institution or facility under the jurisdiction of the authority from which the person has been paroled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 39.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.6.

In parole revocation proceedings, a parolee or his attorney shall receive a copy of any police, arrest, and crime reports pertaining to such proceedings. Portions of such reports containing confidential information need not be disclosed if the parolee or his attorney has been notified that confidential information has not been disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.7.

A sum may be withdrawn by the authority from the funds available for the support of the authority without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements. This sum shall be used as a revolving fund for payments for the care of persons paroled to private homes as provided in Section 1767.5. At the close of each fiscal year, or at any other time, upon demand of the Department of Finance the money so drawn shall be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements submitted to and audited by the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.9.

Any person authorized to appear at a parole hearing pursuant to Section 1767 shall have the right to speak last before the board in regard to those persons appearing and speaking before the board at a parole hearing. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the person presiding at the hearing from taking any steps he or she deems appropriate to ensure that only accurate and relevant statements are considered in determining parole suitability as provided in law, including, but not limited to, the rebuttal of inaccurate statements made by any party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective January 21, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.

As a means of correcting the socially harmful tendencies of a person committed to the authority, the director may

(a) Require participation by him in vocational, physical, educational and corrective training and activities;

(b) Require such conduct and modes of life as seem best adapted to fit him for return to full liberty without danger to the public welfare;

(c) Make use of other methods of treatment conducive to the correction of the person and to the prevention of future public offenses by him;

(d) Provide useful work projects or work assignments for which such persons may qualify and be paid wages for such work from any moneys made available to the director for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.1.
